Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1604.   Dismissal of protest not filed in accordance with requirements.

The protest officer may dismiss a protest described in Section 63G-6a-1602 that is not filed in accordance with the requirements of this part.



Enacted by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

